Utah statutes.
75-5-403.   Venue.
Venue for proceedings under this part is:
(1)  In the county in this state where the person to be protected resides,
whether or not a guardian has been appointed in another place; or
(2)  If the person to be protected does not reside in this state, in any
county where he has property.
